Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB255.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9799.14(c) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 9799.14. Sexual offenses and tier system.* * *(c) Tier II sexual offenses.--The following offenses, or an attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit any of the following offenses, shall be classified as Tier II sexual offenses:* * *(1.5) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.3 (relating to sexual assault by sports official, volunteer or employee of nonprofit association).123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0255PN0207 - 2 - 12